src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-v4_tulla_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo: Proofread the gold standard (below), then run analyser, then correct. 
# mennä 


  Verb - mennä - paradigmgroup v4: # meaning 'to go'/'åka/gå' - GOLD
     mennä+V+Inf: mennä
     mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: menen
     mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: menet
     mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mennee
     mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: menemä
     mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: menettä
     mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [menevä, mennee, menhään]
     mennä+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: [menhään, menthään]
     mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: mene
     mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: menin
     mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: menit
     mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: meni
     mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: menimä
     mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: menittä
     mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [menit, menthiin]
     mennä+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: menthiin
     mennä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: menisin
     mennä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: menisit
     mennä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: menis
     mennä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: menisimmä
     mennä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: menisittä
     mennä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [menisit, menisivvä, menisivä]
     mennä+V+InfE+Ine: mennessä
     mennä+V+InfE+Ins: mennen
     mennä+V+InfMa+Ill: [menehmään, menemhään, menheen]
     mennä+V+InfMa+Ine: menemässä
     mennä+V+InfMa+Ela: menemästä
     mennä+V+InfMa+Ade: menemällä
     mennä+V+InfMa+Abe: menemättä
     mennä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: menevä
     mennä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: menevät
     mennä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: mentävä
     mennä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: mentävät
     mennä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: menny
     mennä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: menheet
     mennä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: menty
     mennä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: mentyt
     mennä+V+Pass+Cond: menis
     mennä+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: meneminen

    
#Verb - tulla - v1: # meaning 'to come'/'komma' - GOLD
     tulla+V+Inf: tulla
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tulen
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tulet
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tullee
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tullee
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tulema
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tuletta
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [tuleva, tullee, tulhaan]
     tulla+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: [tulhaan, tulthaan]
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tule
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tulin
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tulit
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tuli
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tulima
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tulitta
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tulit, tulthiin]
     tulla+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: tulthiin
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: tulisin
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: tulisit
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: tulis
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: tulisimma
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: tulisitta
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [tulisit, tulisiva, tulisivva]
     tulla+V+InfE+Ine: tullessa
     tulla+V+InfE+Ins: tullen
     tulla+V+InfMa+Ill: [tulehmaan, tulemhaan, tulheen]
     tulla+V+InfMa+Ine: tulemassa
     tulla+V+InfMa+Ela: tulemasta
     tulla+V+InfMa+Ade: tulemalla
     tulla+V+InfMa+Abe: tulematta
     tulla+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tuleva
     tulla+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tulevat
     tulla+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tultava
     tulla+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tultavat
     tulla+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tullu
     tulla+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: tulheet
     tulla+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tultu
     tulla+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: tultut
     tulla+V+Pass+Cond: tulis
     tulla+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: tuleminen


#Verb - juosta - v4: # meaning 'to run'/'springa' - GOLD
     juosta+V+Inf: juosta
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juoksen
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: juokset
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juoksee
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: juoksema
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: juoksetta
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [juoksee, juokseva, juosthaan]
     juosta+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: juosthaan
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: juokse
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: juoksin
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: juoksit
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: juoksi
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: juoksima
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: juoksitta
     juosta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [juoksit, juosthaan]
     juosta+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: juosthiin
     juosta+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: juokse
     juosta+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: juosko
     juosta+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: juokse
     juosta+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: juoskaa
     juosta+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: juoksisin
     juosta+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: juoksisit
     juosta+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: juoksis
     juosta+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: juoksisimma
     juosta+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: juoksisitta
     juosta+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [juoksisit, juoksisiva, juoksisivva]
     juosta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: juokseva
     juosta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: juoksevat
     juosta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: juostava
     juosta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: juostavat
     juosta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: juossu
     juosta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: juosheet
     juosta+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: juostu
     juosta+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: juostut
     juosta+V+AgPrc: juoksema
     juosta+V+Pass+Cond: juoksis
     juosta+V+InfE+Ine: juostessa
     juosta+V+InfE+Ins: juosten
     juosta+V+InfMa+Ill: [juoksehmaan, juoksemhaan, juoksheen]
     juosta+V+InfMa+Ine: juoksemassa
     juosta+V+InfMa+Ela: juoksemasta
     juosta+V+InfMa+Ade: juoksemalla
     juosta+V+InfMa+Abe: juoksematta
     juosta+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: juokseminen

#Verb - ajatella - v4_4lla: # meaning 'to think'/'tänka' - GOLD
     ajatella+V+Inf: ajatella
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ajattelen
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ajattelet
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ajattellee
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ajattelema
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ajatteletta
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [ajattelee, ajatteleva, ajatelhaan]
     ajatella+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: ajatelhaan
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ajattele
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ajattelin
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ajattelit
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ajatteli
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ajattelima
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ajattelitta
     ajatella+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [ajatelthiin, ajattelit]
     ajatella+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: ajatelthiin
     ajatella+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ajattele
     ajatella+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: ajatelko
     ajatella+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: ajattele
     ajatella+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: ajatelkhaa
     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: ajattelisin
     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: ajattelisit
     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: ajattelis
     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: ajattelisimma
     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: ajattelisitta
     ajatella+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [ajattelisit, ajattelisiva, ajattelisivva]
     ajatella+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: ajatteleva
     ajatella+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: ajattelevat
     ajatella+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: ajateltava
     ajatella+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: ajateltavat
     ajatella+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: ajatellu
     ajatella+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [ajatelheet, ajatehleet]
     ajatella+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: ajateltu
     ajatella+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: ajateltut
     ajatella+V+AgPrc: ajattelema
     ajatella+V+Pass+Cond: ajateltais
     ajatella+V+InfE+Ine: ajatellessa
     ajatella+V+InfE+Ins: ajatellen
     ajatella+V+InfMa+Ill: [ajattelehmaan, ajattelemhaan]
     ajatella+V+InfMa+Ine: ajattelemassa
     ajatella+V+InfMa+Ela: ajattelemasta
     ajatella+V+InfMa+Ade: ajattelemalla
     ajatella+V+InfMa+Abe: ajattelematta
     ajatella+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: ajatteleminen


#Verb - varjela - v4_4lla: # meaning 'to think'/'tänka' - GOLD
     varjela+V+Inf: varjela
     varjela+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: varjelen
     varjela+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: varjelet
     varjela+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: varjelee
     varjela+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: varjelemma
     varjela+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: varjeletta
     varjela+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [varjelee, varjeleva, varjelevva, varjehlaan, varjelhaan]
     varjela+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: [varjehlaan, varjelhaan]
     varjela+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: varjele
     varjela+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: varjelin
     varjela+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: varjelit
     varjela+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: varjeli
     varjela+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: varjelimma
     varjela+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: varjelitta
     varjela+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [varjelit, varjelthiin]
     varjela+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: varjelthiin
     varjela+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: varjele
     varjela+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: varjelko
     varjela+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: varjele
     varjela+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: varjelkaa
     varjela+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: varjelisin
     varjela+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: varjelisit
     varjela+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: varjelis
     varjela+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: varjelisima
     varjela+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: varjelisitta
     varjela+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [varjelisit, varjelisiva]
     varjela+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: varjeleva
     varjela+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: varjelevat
     varjela+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: varjeltava
     varjela+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: varjeltavat
     varjela+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: varjelu
     varjela+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [varjehleet, varjelheet]
     varjela+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: varjeltu
     varjela+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: varjeltut
     varjela+V+AgPrc: varjelemma
     varjela+V+Pass+Cond: varjeltais
     varjela+V+InfE+Ine: varjelessa
     varjela+V+InfE+Ins: varjelen
     varjela+V+InfMa+Ill: [varjelehmaan, varjelemhaan]
     varjela+V+InfMa+Ine: varjelemassa
     varjela+V+InfMa+Ela: varjelemasta
     varjela+V+InfMa+Ade: varjelemala
     varjela+V+InfMa+Abe: varjelematta
     varjela+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: varjeleminen

#Verb - varjela - v4_4lla: # meaning 'to think'/'tänka' - GOLD
     purasta+V+Inf: purasta
     purasta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: purasen
     purasta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: puraset
     purasta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: purasee
     purasta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: purasemma
     purasta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: purasetta
     purasta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [purasee, puraseva, purasevva, purasthaan]
     purasta+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: [purashaan, purasthaan]
     purasta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: purase
     purasta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: purasin
     purasta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: purasit
     purasta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: purasi
     purasta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: purasimma
     purasta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: purasitta
     purasta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [purasit, purasthiin]
     purasta+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: purasthiin
     purasta+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: purase
     purasta+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: purasko
     purasta+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: purase
     purasta+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: puraskhaa
     purasta+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: purasisin
     purasta+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: purasisit
     purasta+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: purasis
     purasta+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: purasisimma
     purasta+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: purasisitta
     purasta+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [purasisit, purasisiva]
     purasta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: puraseva
     purasta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: purasevat
     purasta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: purastava
     purasta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: purastavat
     purasta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: purassu
     purasta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: purasheet
     purasta+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: purastu
     purasta+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: purastut
     purasta+V+AgPrc: purasema
     purasta+V+Pass+Cond: purasis
     purasta+V+InfE+Ine: purastessa
     purasta+V+InfE+Ins: purasten
     purasta+V+InfMa+Ill: [purasehmaan, purasemhaan, purasheen]
     purasta+V+InfMa+Ine: purasemassa
     purasta+V+InfMa+Ela: purasemasta
     purasta+V+InfMa+Ade: purasemala
     purasta+V+InfMa+Abe: purasematta
     purasta+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: puraseminen
